California statutes. Insurance Code
(b) On and after July 1, 2020, an insurer
 shall provide to an applicant who is denied coverage, or to a policyholder whose policy is canceled or not renewed, information regarding the department’s California Home Insurance Finder. This disclosure may be provided jointly with the disclosure required by subdivision (h) of Section 10095.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 629, Sec. 1.   (AB 1875)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10095.8.

(a) On or before April 1, 2026, the association shall create an automatic payment system and accept automatic payments for premiums from policyholders.

(b) A policy shall not be canceled or nonrenewed solely because the policyholder is not enrolled in automatic payments.

(c) If a policyholder fails to timely pay any outstanding installment premium, the policyholder shall have a period to pay the outstanding installment premium, in accordance with Section 677.4.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 475, Sec. 1.   (AB 290)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10096.

(1) Any applicant or affected insurer shall have the right of appeal from any act or decision of either the facility or the association to the governing committee. A decision of the committee may be appealed to the commissioner within 30 days after such decision. Upon such appeal the commissioner may make any order to implement the purposes of the chapter and the plan.

(2) All orders or decisions of the commissioner made pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to judicial review.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 574.)
-------------------------------------------

10097.

There shall be no liability on the part of, and no cause of action of any nature shall arise against the insurers, the inspection bureau, the facility, the association, the governing committee, their agents or employees, or the commissioner or his authorized representatives, with respect to any inspections required to be undertaken by this chapter or for any acts or omissions in connection therewith, or for any statements made in any reports and communications concerning the insurability of the property, or in the findings required by the provisions of this chapter, or at the hearings conducted in connection therewith. The reports and communications of the inspection bureau, the facility, the association, and the records of the governing committee shall not be considered public documents.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 574.)
-------------------------------------------

10098.

Acceptance of risks assigned under this chapter and performance of any act required by this chapter is a condition of the right to continue to hold a certificate of authority to transact insurance business in this state. All insurers, on and after the effective date of this chapter, by continuing to hold a certificate of authority to transact insurance business shall be deemed to have consented to the responsibilities imposed by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 574.)
-------------------------------------------

10099.

In addition to any powers conferred upon him by this or any other law, the commissioner is authorized to do all things necessary to enable the State of California and any insurer participating in any program approved by the commissioner to fully participate in any federal program of reinsurance which may be hereafter enacted for purposes similar to the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 574.)
-------------------------------------------

10100.

The commissioner may require such reports from insurers concerning risks insured under any program approved pursuant to this chapter as he shall deem necessary to effect the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 574.)
-------------------------------------------

10100.1.

The facility, subject to the approval of the Insurance Commissioner, may provide for the equitable distribution of risks provided for in this chapter by means of assignment to individual members of such facility or by a pool or association of insurers participating in such facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 574.)
-------------------------------------------

10100.2.

(a) (1) Rates for the FAIR Plan shall not be excessive, inadequate, or unfairly discriminatory, and shall be actuarially sound so that premiums are adequate to cover expected losses, expenses and taxes, and shall reflect investment income of the plan. If the plan returns premiums to members annually, the rates shall not include any component relating to surplus enhancements.

(2) If the FAIR Plan policy of a property owner would be subject to a brush surcharge solely because of an adjacent property owner’s failure to comply with applicable laws, ordinances, and regulations regarding brush clearance requirements, the surcharge shall instead be imposed on the policy of the adjacent property owner if the adjacent property is also insured through the FAIR Plan.

(b) Rates for a policy of earthquake property insurance issued by the association shall be established based on the best available scientific information for assessing the risk of earthquake loss. Factors that the association shall consider in adopting rates include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Location of the insured property and its proximity to earthquake faults and to other geological factors affecting the risk of earthquake.

(2) The soil type upon which the insured dwelling is built.

(3) Construction type of the insured dwelling.

(4) The presence of earthquake hazard reduction factors as defined in Section 10089.2.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 10097, all information considered by the association in establishing rates shall be public records.

(d) The classification system established by the association for policies of earthquake property insurance shall not be adjusted or tempered in any manner to provide rates lower than are justified for classifications presenting a high risk of loss, or higher than are justified for classifications presenting a low risk of loss.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 323, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10100.3.

(a) If granted prior approval from the commissioner, the association may do all of the following:

(1) Request the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank to issue bonds from time to time to finance all or any portion of the costs of claims or to increase liquidity and claims-paying capacity, pursuant to Section 63049.75 of the Government Code.

(2) Enter into loan agreements with the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank, pursuant to Section 63049.75 of the Government Code.

(3) Enter into line of credit
 agreements with one or more entities for the purpose of financing the costs of claims or to increase liquidity and claims-paying capacity and to refund lines of credit previously incurred for that purpose.

(4) Secure those loan agreements, line of credit agreements, or agreements described in paragraph (5) by a pledge of, and the grant of a lien and security interest in, collateral, which may include premiums, revenues, receivables, assessments, and any other assets of the association. That pledge, lien, and security interest is subject to Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) of the Commercial Code.

(5) Enter into any other agreement or take any other action necessary or
 convenient to the execution and delivery of bonds, loan agreements, or line of credit agreements.

(b) (1) If the bonds, loan agreements, or lines of credit described in subdivision (a) have received the prior approval of the commissioner as provided in subdivision (a), and if the association is otherwise unable to timely and fully meet its repayment obligation, the association shall assess members in the amounts and at the times necessary to timely pay in full all obligations of the association with respect to those bonds, loan agreements,
 lines of credit, and all obligations of the association under agreements entered into pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (a). 

(2) The FAIR Plan shall not act pursuant to this subdivision without the prior review and approval of the commissioner.

(c) (1) Once approved by the commissioner, specific repayment terms shall not be altered by subsequent amendment to the plan of operation, and amendments to the plan of operation shall not impair the timely payment in full of any obligations of the association with respect to those bonds, loan agreements, lines of credit, and all obligations of the association under agreements entered into pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (a).

(2) The
 state shall not alter, amend, or restrict the provisions of this section in a manner adverse to the rights and interests of bondholders, credit providers, or other parties who have entered into bonds, line of credit agreements, or other agreements pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (a), for so long as the bonds, lines of credit, or other agreements pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) remain outstanding. This subdivision does not preclude altering, amending, or restricting this section if it expressly applies only to agreements issued or entered into on or after the effective date of that alteration, amendment, or restriction.

(3) The association may include the terms of paragraph (2) in an agreement relating to bonds, lines of credit, or other agreements entered into pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (a).

(d) (1) The bonds, loan agreements, lines of credit, and agreements described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) may be secured by a statutory lien on all collateral in favor of the bond trustee, line of credit providers, and lenders, as applicable, to secure the payment and performance of all obligations of the association. This shall be a continuous lien on collateral effective from the time the first bond is issued, or the first line of credit agreement is executed and delivered, whether or not a particular item of collateral exists at the time of the issuance or execution and delivery.

(2) The statutory lien shall be valid, effective, prior, perfected, binding, and enforceable without the need for notification, physical delivery, recordation, filing, or
 further action.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, the beneficiary of the statutory lien becomes entitled to enforce the lien in accordance with the statute under which it was created if a payment default occurs in connection with a lien.

(e) As long as a bond, loan agreement, or line of credit is outstanding, the association shall not be subject to Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010) or Article 14.3 (commencing with Section 1064.1) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 473, Sec. 3.   (AB 226)   Effective October 9, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. California Residential Property Insurance Disclosure [10101. - 10107.]

10101.

(a) A policy of residential property insurance shall not be issued or renewed in this state by an insurer unless the named insured is provided a copy of the California Residential Property Insurance Disclosure pursuant to Section 10102 and a copy of the California Residential Property Insurance Bill of Rights described in Section 10103.5.

(b) On or after July
 1, 2020, a tenant’s policy, a renter’s policy, or a policy insuring individually owned condominium units, when those policies do not provide dwelling structure coverage, shall not be issued or renewed in this state by an insurer unless the named insured is provided a copy of the California Residential Property Insurance Bill of Rights described in Section 10103.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 151, Sec. 1.   (SB 508)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10102.

(a) The disclosure required by Section 10101 shall be in no less than 10-point type and shall be provided prior to or concurrent with, the application for a policy of residential property insurance. In the event that an application is made by telephone, an insurer that mails a copy of the disclosure within three business days shall be in compliance with this section. For policies issued on or after July 1, 1993, the agent or insurer shall obtain the applicant’s signature acknowledging receipt of the disclosure form within 60 days of the date of the application. When the insurer or agent establishes delivery of the disclosure form by obtaining the signature of the applicant or insured, or when an insurer or agent provides the applicant with the
 disclosure form and the applicant does not return a signed acknowledgment of receipt within 60 days of the date it was provided, there shall be a conclusive presumption that the insurer or agent has complied with the disclosure requirement of this chapter. The insurer or agent shall have the burden of demonstrating in accordance with California Rules of Evidence that the disclosure was provided to the applicant or insured. A signature shall not be required at the time of renewal.

If the disclosure is mailed to the named insured or applicant, it shall be mailed to the mailing address shown on the policy of residential property insurance or to the address requested by the applicant. First-class mail shall be deemed adequate for proof of mailing. The insurer shall have the burden of demonstrating in accordance with California Rules of Evidence that the
 disclosure was mailed to the applicant or insured.

The disclosure shall contain the following language:
“NOTICE TO CONSUMERS — CALIFORNIA RESIDENTIAL INSURANCE DISCLOSUREThis disclosure is required by Section 10102 of the California Insurance Code. This form provides general information related to residential property insurance and is not part of your residential property insurance policy. Only the specific provisions of your policy will determine whether a particular loss is covered and the amount payable. The information provided does not preempt existing
 California law.PRIMARY FORMS OF RESIDENTIAL DWELLING COVERAGEYou have purchased the coverage(s) checked below. NOTE: Actual Cash Value Coverage is the most limited level of coverage listed. Guaranteed Replacement Cost is the broadest level of coverage.______  ACTUAL CASH VALUE COVERAGE for either a total or partial loss to the structure or its contents pays the amount it would cost you to repair, rebuild, or replace the thing lost or injured, less a fair and reasonable deduction for physical depreciation based upon its condition at the time of the injury or the policy limit, whichever is less. A deduction for physical depreciation applies only to
 components of a structure that are normally subject to repair and replacement during the useful life of that structure.______  REPLACEMENT COST COVERAGE is intended to provide for the cost to repair or replace the damaged or destroyed dwelling, without a deduction for physical depreciation. Many policies pay only the dwelling’s actual cash value until the insured has actually begun or completed repairs or reconstruction on the dwelling. Coverage only pays for replacement costs up to the limits specified in your policy.______  EXTENDED REPLACEMENT COST COVERAGE is intended to provide for the cost to repair or replace the damaged or destroyed dwelling without a deduction for physical depreciation. Many policies pay only the dwelling’s
 actual cash value until the insured has actually begun or completed repairs or reconstruction on the dwelling. Extended Replacement Cost provides additional coverage above the dwelling limits up to a stated percentage or specific dollar amount. See your policy for the additional coverage that applies.______  GUARANTEED REPLACEMENT COST COVERAGE covers the full cost to repair or replace the damaged or destroyed dwelling for a covered peril regardless of the dwelling limits shown on the policy declarations page.______  BUILDING CODE UPGRADE COVERAGE, also called Ordinance and Law coverage, covers additional costs to repair or replace a dwelling to comply with the building codes and zoning laws in effect at the time of loss or rebuilding.
 These costs may otherwise be excluded by your policy. Meeting current building code requirements can add significant costs to rebuilding your home. Refer to your policy or endorsement for the specific coverage provided and coverage limits that apply.READ YOUR POLICY AND POLICY DECLARATIONS PAGE CAREFULLY: The policy declarations page shows the specific coverage limits you have purchased for your dwelling, personal property, separate structures such as detached garages, and additional living expenses. The actual policy and endorsements provide details on extensions of coverage, limitations of coverage, and coverage conditions and exclusions. The amount of any claim payment made to you will be reduced by any applicable deductibles shown on your policy declarations page. It is important to take the time to consider whether
 the limits and limitations of your policy meet your needs. Contact your agent, broker, or insurance company if you have questions about what is covered or if you want to discuss your coverage options.INFORMATION YOU SHOULD KNOW ABOUT RESIDENTIAL DWELLING INSURANCEAVOID BEING UNDERINSURED: Insuring your home for less than its replacement cost may result in your having to pay thousands of dollars out of your own pocket to rebuild your home if it is completely destroyed. Contact your agent, broker, or insurance company immediately if you believe your policy limits may be inadequate.THE RESIDENTIAL DWELLING COVERAGE LIMIT: The coverage limit on
 the dwelling structure should be high enough so you can rebuild your home if it is completely destroyed. Please note:◼ The cost to rebuild your home is almost always different from the market value.◼ Dwelling coverage limits do not cover the value of your land.◼ The estimate to rebuild your home should be based on construction costs in your area and should be adjusted to account for the features of your home. These features include, but are not limited to, the square footage, type of foundation, number of stories, and the quality of the materials used for items such as flooring, countertops, windows, cabinetry, lighting, and plumbing.◼ The cost to rebuild your home should
 be adjusted each year to account for inflation.◼ Coverage limits for contents, separate structures, additional living expenses, and debris removal are usually based on a percentage of the limit for the dwelling. If your dwelling limit is too low, these coverage limits may also be too low.You are encouraged to obtain a current estimate of the cost to rebuild your home from your insurance agent, broker, or insurance company or an independent appraisal from a local contractor, architect, or real estate appraiser. If you do obtain an estimate of replacement value and wish to change your policy limits, contact your insurance company. While not a guarantee, a current estimate can help protect you against being underinsured.DEMAND SURGE: After a widespread disaster, the cost of construction can increase dramatically as a result of the unusually high demand for contractors, building supplies, and construction labor. This effect is known as demand surge. Demand surge can increase the cost of rebuilding your home. Consider increasing your coverage limits or purchasing Extended Replacement Cost coverage to prepare for this possibility.CHANGES TO PROPERTY: Changes to your property may increase its replacement cost. These changes may include the building of additions, customizing your kitchen or bathrooms, or otherwise remodeling your home. Failure to advise your insurance company of any significant changes to your property may result in your home being underinsured.EXCLUSIONS: Not all causes of damage are covered by common homeowners or residential fire policies. You need to read your policy to see what causes of loss or perils are not covered. Coverage for landslide is typically excluded. Some excluded perils such as earthquake or flood can be purchased as an endorsement to your policy or as a separate policy. Contact your agent, broker, or insurance company if you have a concern about any of the exclusions in your policy.CONTENTS (PERSONAL PROPERTY) COVERAGE DISCLOSURE: This disclosure form does not explain the types of contents coverage provided by your policy for items such as your furniture or clothing. Contents may be covered on either an actual cash value or replacement cost basis depending on the contract. Almost all
 policies include specific dollar limitations on certain property that is particularly valuable, such as jewelry, art, or silverware. Contact your agent, broker, or insurance company if you have any questions about your contents coverage. You should create a list of all personal property in and around your home. Pictures and video recordings also help you document your property. The list, photos, and video should be stored away from your home.CONSUMER ASSISTANCE: If you have any concerns or questions, contact your agent, broker, or insurance company. You are also encouraged to contact the California Department of Insurance consumer information line at (800) 927-HELP (4357) or at www.insurance.ca.gov for free insurance assistance.”(b) The agent or insurer shall indicate on the disclosure form which coverages the applicant or insured has selected or purchased.

(c) The disclosure statement may contain additional provisions not conflicting with, annulling, or detracting from the foregoing.

(d) Following the issuance of the policy of residential property insurance, the insurer shall provide the disclosure statement to the insured on an every-other-year basis at the time of renewal. The disclosure required by this section may be transmitted with the material required by Section 10086.1.

(e) A policy of residential property insurance shall not be initially issued as guaranteed replacement cost
 coverage if it contains any maximum limitation of coverage based on any set dollar limits, percentage amounts, construction cost limits, indexing, or any other preset maximum limitation for covered damage to the insured dwelling. The limitations referred to in this section are solely applicable to dwelling structure coverages. Endorsements covering additional risks to the insurer’s dwelling structure coverage may have internal limits as long as those endorsements are not called guaranteed replacement cost coverage.

(f) A policy of residential property insurance shall not be renewed as guaranteed replacement cost coverage if it contains any maximum limitation of coverage based on any set dollar limits, percentage amounts, construction cost limits, indexing, or any other preset maximum limitation for covered damage to the insured
 dwelling. The limitations referred to in this section are solely applicable to dwelling structure coverages. Endorsements covering additional risks to the insurer’s dwelling structure coverage may have internal limits as long as those endorsements are not called guaranteed replacement cost coverage.

(g) Coverage provided for building code upgrades by a policy of residential property insurance shall be applicable to building codes, ordinances, standards, or laws only to the extent that those codes, ordinances, standards, or laws do not impose stricter standards on the property on the basis of the level of insurance coverage applicable to the property.

(h) The disclosure required by Section 10101 shall also be provided to the mortgagor in the event that a policy is forced placed by
 an insurer at the request of a mortgagee. In those cases, neither the insurer nor the mortgagee shall be required to obtain a signature from the mortgagor. A disclosure shall not be required to be provided with respect to blanket policies issued to a mortgagee, and designed to provide interim coverage for losses occurring before the mortgagee has knowledge of the lapse of the policy and before placement of a policy on behalf of the mortgagor.

(i) A disclosure required by Section 10101 that is provided on and after January 1, 2020, shall include any fire safety-related discounts offered by the insurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 263, Sec. 2.   (AB 2756)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10103.

(a) A policy of residential property insurance shall not be issued or renewed in this state unless it provides the following information on the declarations page of the policy:

(1) The limits of liability for the structure.

(2) The following statement regarding the valuation of the structure:“The limit of liability for this structure (Coverage A) is based on an estimate of the cost to rebuild your home, including an approximate cost for labor and materials in your area, and specific information that you have provided about your
 home.”

(3) Limits of liability for personal property.

(4) Deductibles.

(5) For a residential property insurance policy that provides replacement cost coverage, a statement that the policy provides building code upgrade coverage for the increased costs of repairing or replacing damage to the insured dwelling caused by a covered loss because of building ordinances or laws regulating the repair or replacement. Building code upgrade coverage is provided based on the increased costs associated with building ordinances or laws in effect at the time of loss or rebuilding, up to policy limits for this coverage. The policy may denote restrictions, if any, on coverage for compliance with applicable building codes that
 take effect after the date of loss, but before the issuance of required building permits.

(b) If the policy includes building code upgrade coverage, it shall do both of the following:

(1) State it includes building code upgrade coverage on the declaration page in no less than 10-point type, state any applicable limits on the amount of coverage, and, if the policy contains other terms, conditions, or restrictions for coverage, disclose on the declarations page that those terms, conditions, or restrictions are identified on a separate disclosure form attached to the declarations page.

(2) If the building code upgrade coverage is subject to any terms, limits, conditions, or restrictions, state the terms, limits, conditions,
 or restrictions on a separate disclosure form attached to the declarations page. The separate disclosure form shall be printed in no less than 10-point type.

(c) An open policy of residential property insurance that provides replacement cost coverage shall not be issued or renewed unless it provides additional building code upgrade coverage of no less than 10 percent of the dwelling coverage policy limits. The building code upgrade coverage required by this subdivision shall be additional coverage, and use of this coverage shall not reduce or deplete the dwelling coverage policy limits for the insured property. This subdivision does not prohibit an insurer from offering building code upgrade coverage of greater than 10 percent of the dwelling coverage policy limits, in addition to providing the minimum coverage of 10 percent of the dwelling
 coverage policy limits.

(d) The provisions of paragraphs
 (1), (2), and (5) of subdivision (a), subdivision (b), and subdivision (c) are not required for policies purchased by tenants or unit owners that do not cover the structure of the premises.

(e) (1) The requirements of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a), subdivision (b), and subdivision (c) do not apply to a policy of residential property insurance that provides actual cash value coverage and does not provide replacement cost coverage or building code upgrade coverage.

(2) The requirements of subdivision (c) do not apply to a policy of residential property insurance that is an apartment policy, a tenant’s policy, a renter’s policy, a mobilehome policy, or a policy insuring individually owned condominium units, if the policy of residential property
 insurance does not provide dwelling structure coverage. The requirements of subdivision (c) also do not apply to a policy covering all or part of a commercial or farm operation, including a policy covering a structure or dwelling unit on commercial or farm property, regardless of whether the structure or dwelling unit is owner occupied or rented for individual residential purposes.

(3) A policy of residential property insurance that does not provide building code upgrade coverage shall include on the declarations page of the policy in no less than 10-point type the following statement: “THIS POLICY DOES NOT INCLUDE BUILDING CODE UPGRADE COVERAGE.”

(f) The amendments to this section made by the act adding this subdivision shall be operative for any policy issued or renewed on
 or after July 1, 2021, except that an insurer that files a complete rate application, including, without limitation, a form change application or rule filing, by no later than April 1, 2021, in order to comply with the provisions of this act, shall begin issuing and renewing policies in compliance with this section within 75 days following the commissioner’s prior approval of that complete rate application, including, without limitation, a form change application or rule filing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 263, Sec. 3.   (AB 2756)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10103.2.

(a) On and after July 1, 2020, upon an offer of a policy of residential property insurance, a disclosure shall be provided to the applicant that states policies offering extended replacement cost coverage of at least 50 percent may be available for that property and that includes the internet website address of the department’s Homeowners Coverage Comparison Tool, pursuant to the following conditions:

(1) If an insurer does not offer at least 50 percent above the residential dwelling coverage limit to the applicant, the insurer shall provide the disclosure.

(2) If an insurer, utilizing an agent or broker, does not offer an applicant at least 50 percent above the residential dwelling coverage limit to the applicant, the insurer, agent, or broker shall provide the disclosure.

(3) If an agent or broker provides quotes to a consumer from multiple insurers, but none of the offers include coverage at least 50 percent above the residential dwelling coverage limit, the agent or broker shall provide the disclosure.

(b) (1) If an insurer offers at least 50 percent above the residential dwelling coverage limit to the applicant, the insurer is
 not required to make a disclosure pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) If an agent or broker provides quotes to a consumer from multiple insurers, and at least one of the insurers offers 50 percent above the residential dwelling coverage limit, the insurer, agent, or broker is not required to make a disclosure pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) An insurer that offers policies of residential property insurance shall notify the department on or before February 1 of each year of the amount of extended replacement cost coverage offered by the insurer for each policy or product it sells in California if the amount is different than what was reported in the previous year. The department shall use this information to annually update the Homeowners Coverage Comparison Tool on the department’s internet website.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 201, Sec. 11.   (AB 1813)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10103.4.

(a) An insurer that provides replacement cost coverage in accordance with Section 10102, except an insurer that satisfies the requirements of subdivision (b), shall, on an every other year basis, at the time an offer to renew a policy of residential property insurance is made to the policyholder, provide an estimate of the cost necessary to rebuild or replace the insured structure that complies with Sections 2695.180 to 2695.183, inclusive, of Article 1.3 of Subchapter 7.5 of
 Chapter 5 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations, as those sections provided on January 1, 2018.

(b) An insurer that satisfies either of the following is not subject to subdivision (a):

(1) The policyholder has requested, within the two years prior to the offer to renew the policy, and the insurer has provided, coverage limits greater than the previous limits that the policyholder had selected.

(2) The insurer has, in connection with its annual offer to renew the policy, done both of the following:

(A) Offers, on an every other year basis, the policyholder the right to have a new estimate of the replacement cost for the insured dwelling, that is compliant with Sections 2695.180 to 2695.183, inclusive, of Article 1.3 of Subchapter 7.5 of
 Chapter 5 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations, as those sections provided on January 1, 2018, provided the policyholder provides the necessary, requested information.

(B) Offered the renewal of the policy and the dwelling coverage limit in the renewal offer is based on an inflation factor that reflects the cost of construction in the policyholder’s geographic area. This paragraph applies whether or not the policyholder has elected to accept that coverage limit.

(c) This section shall not be deemed to limit or preclude an insurer and insured from agreeing to provide coverage for a policy limit that is greater or lesser than the estimate of replacement value provided in accordance with subdivision (a).

(d) This section is not intended to change existing law with respect to the duty of the policyholder or
 applicant to select the coverage limits for a policy of residential property insurance.

(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2019.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 205, Sec. 1.   (AB 1797)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative July 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

10103.5.

(a) Every California Residential Property Insurance Disclosure shall be accompanied by a California Residential Property Insurance Bill of Rights. If the insurer provides the insured with an electronic copy of a policy, the bill of rights may also be transmitted electronically.

(b) The California Residential Property Insurance Bill of Rights shall be plainly prepared in no less than 10-point type. The Bill of Rights shall contain the following:“California Residential Property Insurance Bill of RightsA consumer is entitled to receive information regarding residential property insurance. The following is a limited overview of information that your insurance company can
 provide:•The insurance company’s customer service telephone number for

 underwriting, rating, and claims inquiries.•A written explanation for any cancellation or nonrenewal of your policy.•A copy of the insurance policy.•An explanation of how your policy limits were established.•In the event of a claim, an itemized, written scope of loss report prepared

 by the insurer or its adjuster within a reasonable time period.•In the event of a claim, a copy of the Unfair Practices Act and, if requested,

 a copy of the Fair Claims Settlement Practices Regulations.•In the event of a claim, notification of a consumer’s rights with respect to

 the appraisal process for resolving claims disputes.•An offer of coverage and premium quote for earthquake coverage, if eligible.A consumer is also entitled to select a licensed contractor or vendor to repair, replace, or rebuild damaged property covered by the insurance policy.The information provided herein is not all inclusive and does not negate or preempt existing California law. If you have any concerns or questions, contact your agent, broker, insurance company, or the California Department of Insurance consumer information line at (800) 927-HELP (4357) or at www.insurance.ca.gov for free insurance assistance.”(c) (1) The bill of rights shall be distributed by all insurers licensed to sell residential property insurance in this state.

(2) If the insurer under a personal lines residential property insurance policy reports claims history or loss experience of insureds under those policies to an insurance-support organization, the insurer shall include the following disclosure in the California Residential Property Insurance Bill of Rights:
“This insurer reports claim information to one or more claims information databases. The claim information is used to furnish loss history reports to insurers. If you are interested in obtaining a report from a claims information database, you may do so by contacting:

(Insert the name, toll-free telephone number, and, if applicable, internet website address of each claims
 information database to which the insurer reports the information covered by this section)”
(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 2) and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 151, Sec. 3.   (SB 508)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Section operative July 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

10103.6.

(a) If an insurer issues a new residential property insurance policy on or after July 1, 2021, that does not provide coverage for the peril of fire, the insurer shall, on or before the date of issuance of the policy, obtain a signed acknowledgment from the applicant or insured stating that the newly issued policy does not provide coverage for the peril of fire. If the applicant or insured does not sign the required acknowledgment on or before the issuance of the policy, the insurer shall obtain the signed acknowledgment from the applicant or insured within 60 days of the date of issuance of the policy. For purposes of this subdivision, a new or newly issued policy does not include renewal of an existing policy, including a
 renewal that contains different terms than the preceding policy periods.

(b) If an insurer issues or renews a residential property insurance policy on or after July 1, 2021, that does not provide coverage for the peril of fire, the insurer shall prominently disclose both of the following on the declarations page of the policy:

(1) The following statement in bold, uppercase letters in no less than 12-point type:
THIS POLICY DOES NOT COVER THE PERIL OF FIRE. THERE ARE OTHER RESOURCES FOR FINDING FIRE COVERAGE, INCLUDING USING THE CALIFORNIA DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE’S HOME INSURANCE FINDER OR PURCHASING COVERAGE FROM THE CALIFORNIA FAIR PLAN ASSOCIATION.
(2) Information on the California FAIR Plan, as required by subdivision (h) of Section 10095, and the information on the California Home Insurance Finder, as required by subdivision (b) of Section 10095.7.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 263, Sec. 4.   (AB 2756)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10103.7.

(a) In the event of a covered loss relating to a state of emergency, as defined in Section 8558 of the Government Code, an insured under a residential property insurance policy shall be permitted to combine payments for claims for losses up to the policy limits for the primary dwelling and other structures, for any of the covered expenses reasonably necessary to rebuild or replace the damaged or destroyed dwelling, if the policy limits for coverage to rebuild or replace the primary dwelling are insufficient. Any claims payments for losses pursuant to this subdivision for which replacement cost coverage is applicable shall be for the full replacement value of the loss without requiring actual replacement of the other structures. Claims payments
 for other structures in excess of the amount applied towards the necessary cost to rebuild or replace the damaged or destroyed dwelling shall be paid according to the terms of the policy.
